Utah statutes.
67-4a-902.   Property not subject to reporting under prior law.

The initial report filed under this chapter for property that was not required to be reported under prior law shall include all items of property that are considered abandoned as of the effective date of this chapter.



Enacted by Chapter 198, 1995 General Session

